District of Columbia statutes.
25-1003

Prohibition on beverage storage containers in the DC Arena.

(a)

No person shall bring, or have in his or her possession, anywhere on the premises of the DC Arena, including space referred to in section § 25-114, a container used to hold or store beverages or liquids of any kind, including bottles and cans.

(b)

This section shall not apply to a person licensed by the Board to possess, sell, give away, transport, or store alcoholic beverages or containers on the premises of the DC Arena; to an employee or agency acting for any such duly authorized or licensed person; or to a container provided on the premises of the DC Arena by the lessee or its concessionaires and tenants.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 319, Ch. 4, § 28a
as added Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(c), 45 DCR 8412
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-233, § 202(d), 62 DCR 438
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-233: Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-233 provided (1) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 202(d) of the Soccer Stadium Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-557, Dec. 30, 2014, 62 DCR 448, 20 STAT 4467).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of § 5 of the Alcoholic Beverage Control DC Arena Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-551, December 24, 1998, 45 DCR 517), see § 3 of the Omnibus Regulatory Reform and Alcoholic Beverage Control DC Arena Clarifying Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-1, January 29, 1999, 46 DCR 2284).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of the Alcoholic Beverage Control DC Arena Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-478, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 8010) and § 2(c) of the Alcoholic Beverage Control DC Arena Second Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-551, December 24, 1998, 45 DCR 517).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-233 would have added “and the Soccer Stadium” in the section heading; would have added “or the Soccer Stadium” in (a) and (b); and would have substituted “DC Arena or the Soccer Stadium, by the lessee of the DC Arena or its concessionaires and tenants, or by the operator of the Soccer Stadium” for “DC Arena by the lessee” in (b).
1981 Ed., § 25-1003.